Hawaii statutes.
[§11-317] Exemptions. (a) The
commission shall be exempt from section 26-35(a)(1), (4), and (5) and shall:

(1) Make direct communications with the governor and
legislature;

(2) Make all decisions regarding employment,
appointment, promotion, transfer, demotion, discharge, and job descriptions of
all officers and employees of or under the jurisdiction of the commission
without the approval of the comptroller; and

(3) Purchase all supplies, equipment, or furniture
without the approval of the comptroller.

(b) The commission shall follow and be subject
to all applicable personnel laws. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next